Maryland, session 2025, HB1403.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
5–201.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1403*

HOUSE BILL 1403
(a) In this subtitle, except as otherwise provided, the following words have the
meanings indicated.
(e) “Enrollment count” means the greater of:
(1) The full–time equivalent enrollment; or
(2) The 3–year moving average enrollment.
(f) “Foundation program” means the product of the annual per pupil foundation
amount and a county’s enrollment count.
(g) “Full–time equivalent enrollment” means the sum of:
(1) The AVERAGE number of students enrolled in kindergarten through
grade 12 or their equivalent in regular day school programs on September 30, DECEMBER
31, MARCH 31, AND THE LAST DAY of the prior school year;
(2) The number of full–time equivalent students, as determined by a
regulation of the Department, enrolled in evening high school programs during the prior
school year; and
(3) The number of P–TECH students, as provided in § 7–1804(b) of this
article.
(t) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, “3–year moving
average enrollment” means the average of the full–time equivalent enrollment in the 3
prior school years.
(2) If the 3 prior school years includes the 2020–2021 school year, “3–year
moving average enrollment” means:
(i) The sum of the full–time equivalent enrollment for the 4 prior
school years minus the 2020–2021 school year full–time equivalent enrollment; divided by
(ii) Three.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to the calculation of education funding for fiscal years
beginning after June 30, 2026.